Hawaii, session 2025, HB671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Native Hawaiian majority districts; designation.  (a)  The department shall identify all legislative districts in the State in which a majority of the population consists of Native Hawaiians. (b) Any district identified by the department pursuant to subsection (a) shall be designated as a Native Hawaiian majority district for purposes of representation and recognition." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________